Utah statutes.
41-1a-709.   Dealer transfer of used off-highway vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor.

Upon the resale or subsequent transfer by a dealer of a used off-highway vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor, the dealer shall endorse the certificate of title and forward it, accompanied by the transferee's application for a certificate of title, or if desired by the purchaser, and as applicable, a receipt of surrender of ownership documents, to the division.



Amended by Chapter 266, 2013 General Session

